California statutes. Water Code
(g) Before granting a permit under this chapter, the department may require any applicant, other than a county, city, city and county, or public agency that is authorized by law to establish and maintain any works or facilities within the department’s right-of-way, to file with the department a satisfactory bond payable to the department in an amount that the department determines to be sufficient, conditioned on the proper compliance by the permittee with this chapter. The department may require a bond from a county, city, city and county, or public agency that, prior to submitting an application, failed to comply with this chapter or with the conditions of a previous permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12899.3.

No corporation has any franchise rights within the department’s right-of-way, and no county, city, or city and county has any right to grant a franchise within that right-of-way. This section does not apply to a State Water Resources Development System right-of-way located within city, county, or city and county public roadways.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12899.4.

The department may delegate, to any entity that has a contract with the department pursuant to Section 11625, any of the department’s powers, duties and authority, other than approval, under this chapter as to any facility of the State Water Resources Development System that primarily benefits that entity, and may withdraw that delegation of authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12899.5.

(a) Except as provided by Section 12899.8, if any encroachment exists within the department’s right-of-way, the department may require the removal of the encroachment in the manner provided in this section.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e), notice shall be given to the owner, occupant, or person in possession of the encroachment, or to any other person causing or permitting the encroachment to exist, by serving a notice including a demand for the immediate removal of the encroachment from within the right-of-way. The notice shall describe the encroachment with reasonable certainty as to its character and location. In lieu of service upon the person, service of the notice may also be made by registered mail and posting for a period of five days, a copy of the notice on the encroachment described in the notice. In the case of an owner, occupant or person in possession, who is not present in the county, the notice may be given to an agent in lieu of service by mailing and posting.

(c) The department may remove from the State Water Resources Development System any right-of-way encroachment that meets both of the following criteria:

(1) Not later than 60 days from the date on which a notice was given pursuant to subdivision (b), the owner, occupant, or person in possession of the encroachment has not asserted a right to be in possession consistent with Section 12899.8 and has not removed, or commenced to remove in a diligent manner, the encroachment.

(2) The encroachment obstructs, threatens, or prevents the proper operation, maintenance, or rehabilitation of the State Water Resources Development System.

(d) The department may immediately remove from the State Water Resources Development System any right-of-way encroachment that meets both of the following criteria:

(1) Not later than five days from the date on which a notice is given pursuant to subdivision (b), the owner, occupant, or person in possession of the encroachment has not asserted a right to be in possession consistent with Section 12899.8 and has not removed, or commenced to remove in a diligent manner, the encroachment.

(2) The encroachment poses an imminent threat to the integrity of one or more features of the State Water Resources Development System.

(e) In the case of an emergency, the department has the authority to take any action necessary to avert, alleviate, repair, or mitigate any threat to the State Water Resources Development System. For the purposes of this chapter, “emergency” means a sudden, unexpected occurrence that poses a clear and imminent danger, requiring immediate action to prevent or mitigate the loss or impairment of life, health, property, or essential public services.

(f) If the department removes any encroachment upon the failure of the owner to comply with the notice pursuant to this section, the department may recover the expense of the removal, costs and expenses of suit, including attorneys fees, and, in addition, the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the encroachment remains after the expiration of the applicable response period described in subdivision (c) or (d).

(g) If the owner, occupant, or person in possession of the encroachment, or person causing or suffering the encroachment to exist, or the agent of any of these parties, disputes or denies the existence of the encroachment, asserts a right to be in possession consistent with Section 12899.8, or refuses to remove or permit the removal of the encroachment, the department may commence, in any court of competent jurisdiction, an action to abate the encroachment as a public nuisance. If judgment is recovered by the department, it may, in addition to having the encroachment adjudged a nuisance and abated, recover one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the encroachment remains after the expiration of the applicable response period described in subdivision (c) or (d), and may also recover the expense of that removal, and costs and expenses of the suit, including attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12899.6.

(a) Unless a person is otherwise authorized, by permit or agreement, to do so, it is unlawful for any person to do any of the following acts:

(1) Drain water, or permit water to be drained, from the person’s lands onto the State Water Resources Development System right-of-way by any means, which results in damage to the system or the department’s right-of-way, except where the water naturally drains onto the department’s right-of-way.

(2) Obstruct any natural watercourse in a manner that does any of the following:

(A) Prevents, impedes, or restricts the natural flow of waters from any portion of the department’s right-of-way into and through the watercourse or State Water Resources Development System cross drainage structures, unless other adequate and proper drainage is provided.

(B) Causes waters to be impounded within the department’s right-of-way that damages the State Water Resources Development System or the department’s right-of-way, except where the water naturally drains onto the department’s right-of-way.

(C) Causes interference with, or damages or makes hazardous the operation, maintenance, and rehabilitation of, the State Water Resources Development System.

(3) Stores or distributes water for any purpose so as to permit the water to overflow onto, causing damage to, or to obstruct or damage any portion of, the State Water Resources Development System or the department’s right-of-way.

(b) When notice is given by the department, in the manner provided in Section 12899.5, to any person permitting a condition to exist, as described in subdivision (a), the person shall immediately cease and discontinue the diversion of waters or shall discontinue and prevent the drainage, seepage, or overflow and shall repair, or pay for the repair of, any damage to the State Water Resources Development System or the department’s right-of-way. The person to whom the notice is provided may challenge, administratively in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to Section 12899.9, or in a court of competent jurisdiction, the propriety of the determination by the department.

(c) If any person is notified pursuant to subdivision (b) and fails, neglects, or refuses to cease and discontinue the diversion, drainage, seepage, or overflow of the waters or to make or pay for the repairs, the department may make repairs and perform work as it determines necessary to prevent the further drainage, diversion, overflow, or seepage of the waters.

(d) The department may recover in an action at law, in any court of competent jurisdiction, the amount expended for those repairs and work, and in addition, the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the drainage, diversion, overflow, or seepage of the waters is permitted to continue, after the service of the notice in the manner specified in this chapter, together with the costs and expenses, including attorney’s fees, incurred in the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 674.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

12899.7.

Any person who by any means willfully or negligently injures or damages any feature of the State Water Resources Development System or the department’s right-of-way is liable for necessary repairs, and the department may recover in an action at law the amount expended for the repairs, together with the costs and expenses, including attorney’s fees, incurred in that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 675.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

12899.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, and except as otherwise provided in an agreement between the department and landowner or predecessor-in-interest, any person owning a legal real property interest over a portion of the State Water Resources Development System right-of-way, or who has an agreement with the department for the construction, operation, and maintenance of an encroachment, is not required to obtain a permit from the department for exercising their property or other rights, but shall submit their plans to the department for review and comment before undertaking any additional work within the department’s right-of-way. A person’s legal real property or other interests shall be determined by the department upon the review of the appropriate document, agreement, or reservation of rights. The department shall respond not later than 30 days from the date of the receipt of the plans.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any holder of a current State Water Resources Development System encroachment permit on January 1, 2007, or a person who has an agreement with the department for the construction, operation, and maintenance of an encroachment as of that date, may continue the authorized encroachment pursuant to the terms, conditions, and limitations of that permit or agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12899.9.

The department may adopt regulations to implement this chapter, including regulations that provide for the filing of an application for a permit, related administrative review and inspection, the imposition of permit fees and permit terms and conditions, an administrative appeal process, and a process for administrative review and regulation of existing encroachments in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12899.10.

This chapter does not apply to the activities of a public agency that operates facilities of the State Water Resources Development System that are jointly owned by the state and the United States, including facilities of the San Luis Unit of the Central Valley Project, if the activities are conducted pursuant to, and consistent with, an agreement with the United States for the operation and maintenance of those facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12899.11.

(a) The department, not later than 60 days from the date on which it receives a complete application, shall issue a general encroachment permit, for a period not to exceed 10 years, for routine operation and maintenance activities of public agencies with a contract with the department for delivery of water pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12937.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “operation and maintenance” means inspection, equipment testing and maintenance, water quality monitoring and testing, weed and pest abatement, and other activities that the department determines are consistent with existing agreements between the department and its water contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. California Water Fund [12900. - 12915.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12900. - 12901.]

12900.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Water Fund Law of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

12901.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Project” means any project constructed by a public agency, as defined by Section 12880, by the State, or by the State in co-operation with the Federal Government, for the development, utilization, and distribution of the water resources of the State, including all necessary or convenient property, works, and facilities.

(b) “Fund” means the California Water Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2104.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The California Water Fund [12910. - 12915.]

12910.

The California Water Fund is created as a special fund in the State Treasury, the moneys, securities, and increment of which shall be held by the State Treasurer and shall be expended upon projects when appropriated by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

12911.

The Investment Fund in the State Treasury is hereby abolished. Upon the effective date of this chapter, the Controller shall transfer all resources of the Investment Fund to the California Water Fund. All references in any law to the Investment Fund shall hereafter be deemed to refer to the California Water Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

12912.

There shall be deposited in the California Water Fund:

(a) All resources of the Investment Fund.

(b) All receipts and revenues of any type and nature derived from any project constructed, operated, or maintained in whole or in part from the fund, except such receipts and revenues which are necessary to pay the costs of operation, maintenance, replacement, and debt service in connection with the project, and all receipts and revenues of any type or nature derived by the state from joint-use projects between the state and the federal government, except such receipts and revenues which are necessary to pay the costs of operation, maintenance, replacement and debt service, in connection with any such project.

(c) Such moneys in other funds which the Legislature may hereafter direct the Controller to transfer to the fund, and any money required to be deposited in the California Water Fund pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 6217 of the Public Resources Code.

(d) All revenues received by the state pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 29, Statutes of 1956, First Extraordinary Session.

(e) All money from any state bond issue authorized and sold for the purposes of this chapter.

(f) All other funds made available solely for the purposes of this chapter by gift or any other means.

(g) All income derived from the investment of moneys that are in the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

12912.5.

Of the amounts deposited in the California Water Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6217 of the Public Resources Code, five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be deposited annually in a special account in the California Water Fund for appropriation by the Legislature to the Department of Water Resources for purposes of mitigation of adverse effects to water quality, fisheries, or wildlife in (1) the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta, Suisun Marsh, and San Francisco Bay caused by historic upstream depletions and diversions, as nonreimbursable costs under Section 11912 and for other nonreimbursable costs, and (2) the Salton Sea and its tributaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 28, Sec. 4.   Effective March 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

12913.

The Director of Finance shall cause all moneys in the fund which are in excess of current requirements to be invested and reinvested from time to time in securities described in Section 16430 of the Government Code, and such securities may be sold or exchanged if in his opinion such sale or exchange is in the best interests of the State in effectuating the purposes of this chapter. All income derived from such investment, reinvestment, sale, or exchange shall be credited to the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

12914.

All of the assets in the fund shall be retained in the State Treasury in the fund and shall not be expended except upon appropriations made by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

12915.

To the extent the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent or in conflict with any of those provisions of Part 3 (commencing at Section 11100) of Division 6, the provisions of this chapter shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.5. Protection of Ground Water Basins [12920. - 12924.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [12920. - 12920.]

12920.

This chapter shall be known as, and may be cited as, the Porter-Dolwig Ground Water Basin Protection Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1620.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [12921. - 12921.3.]

12921.

The definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1620.)
-------------------------------------------

12921.1.

“Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1620.)
-------------------------------------------

12921.2.

“Local agency” means any county, city, state agency or public district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1620.)
-------------------------------------------

12921.3.

“Project” means any physical structure or facility proposed or constructed under this chapter for the conservation, storage, regulation, reclamation, treatment or transportation of water to replenish, recharge, or restore a ground water basin, or to prevent, stem, or repel the intrusion of sea water therein, or to improve the quality of the waters thereof, when such basin is relied upon as a source of public water supply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1620.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Declaration of Policy [12922. - 12922.1.]

12922.

It is hereby declared that the people of the State have a primary interest in the correction and prevention of irreparable damage to, or impaired use of, the ground water basins of this State caused by critical conditions of overdraft, depletion, sea water intrusion or degraded water quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1620.)
-------------------------------------------

12922.1.

The Legislature finds and declares that the greater portion of the water used in this State is stored, regulated, distributed and furnished by its ground water basins, and that such basins are subject to critical conditions of overdraft, depletion, sea water intrusion and degraded water quality causing great detriment to the peace, health, safety and welfare of the people of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1620.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Declaration of Intent [12923. - 12924.]

12923.

It is the intention of the Legislature that the department shall, whenever money has been appropriated for the purpose, initiate or participate in investigations, studies, plans and design criteria for construction of any project, or projects, deemed by the department to be practical, economically feasible and urgently needed to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

It is the further intention of the Legislature that upon the submission by any local agency, or agencies, to the department of plans and design criteria for any project, or projects, a review, evaluation and any necessary revision of such plans and design criteria shall be made by the department to insure that construction of such project, or projects, will accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

It is the further intention of the Legislature that where a local agency, or agencies, has duly instituted a project, the department may provide technical assistance to the local agency. Any participation by the department shall be pursuant to a cooperative agreement between the department and local agency which clearly outlines the area of participation, the reporting procedure, and the maximum limitation upon cost. Funds for the technical assistance provided under this section shall be as set forth in the cooperative agreement with substantial participation or cost sharing, or both, by the local agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1460.)
-------------------------------------------

12923.1.

The results of the investigations and studies conducted and the plans and design criteria developed by the department pursuant to this article shall be transmitted to the State Water Resources Control Board and to the appropriate California regional water quality control boards for their consideration in the adoption of state policy for water quality control, water quality control plans and waste discharge requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

12924.

(a) The department, in conjunction with other public agencies, shall conduct an investigation of the state’s groundwater basins. The department shall identify the state’s groundwater basins on the basis of geological and hydrological conditions and consideration of political boundary lines whenever practical. The department shall also investigate existing general patterns of groundwater extraction and groundwater recharge within those basins to the extent necessary to identify basins that are subject to critical conditions of overdraft.

(b) The department may revise the boundaries of groundwater basins identified in subdivision (a) based on its own investigations or information provided by others.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall report its findings to the Governor and, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the Legislature in years ending in five.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 14, Sec. 11.   (SB 124)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.6. Groundwater Recharge Facilities Financing [12925. - 12928.6.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [12925. - 12925.]

12925.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Groundwater Recharge Facilities Financing Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1034, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Declaration of Policy [12926. - 12926.]

12926.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Recharge is an effective way to maximize availability of scarce water supplies throughout the state.

(b) There are many groundwater basins in the state that are in an overdraft condition.

(c) It is necessary for the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the state that the groundwater basins of the state be recharged.

(d) Many of the agencies that have responsibility for managing groundwater are unable to finance adequate groundwater recharge and storage programs, and it is in the interest of the people of California that the state provide financial assistance to implement these programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1034, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Definitions [12927. - 12927.]

12927.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

(a) “In-lieu recharge” means accomplishing increased storage of groundwater by providing interruptible surface water to a user who relies on groundwater as a primary supply, to accomplish groundwater storage through the direct use of that surface water in lieu of pumping groundwater. In-lieu recharge would be used rather than continuing pumping while artificially recharging with the interruptible surface waters.

(b) “Project” means land and facilities for artificial groundwater recharge through methods which include, but are not limited to, (1) percolation using basins, pits, ditches and furrows, modified streambed, flooding, and well injection or (2) in-lieu recharge. “Project” also means land and facilities already in use for the purpose of groundwater recharge.

“Project” may include any of the following:

(1) Instream facilities for regulation of water levels, but not regulation of streamflow by storage to accomplish diversion from the waterway.

(2) Agency owned facilities for extraction.

(3) Conveyance facilities to the recharge site, including devices for flow regulation and measurement of recharge waters.

Any part or all of the project facilities, including the land under the facilities, may consist of the separable features, or an appropriate share of multipurpose features, of a larger system, or both.

(c) “Local agency” or “agency” means any city, county, district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision of the state involved with water management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1034, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Loans [12928. - 12928.6.]

12928.

(a) The money in the 1985 Water Conservation and Groundwater Recharge Bond Fund shall be available for appropriation by the Legislature for loans to local agencies to aid in the conduct of projects for artificial groundwater recharge and the purposes set forth in this section. The loan program shall be administered by the department. Administrative costs of the loan program shall be paid from moneys available therefor in the 1985 Water Conservation and Groundwater Recharge Bond Fund as appropriated by the Legislature in the annual Budget Bill.

(b) The department may enter into a contract for a loan if it finds that the agency has the ability to repay the requested loan, that the project is economically justified, and that the project is feasible from an engineering and hydrogeologic viewpoint. However, any contract concerning an eligible project for artificial groundwater recharge shall include, in substance, all of the following:

(1) An estimate of the reasonable cost and benefit of the project, including a feasibility report which shall set forth the economic justification and the engineering, hydrogeologic, and financial feasibility of the project, and shall include explanations of the proposed facilities and their relation to other water-related facilities in the basin or region.

(2) An agreement by the agency to proceed expeditiously to complete the project in conformance with the approved plans and specifications and the feasibility report and to operate and maintain the project properly upon completion throughout the repayment period.

(3) Loan contracts may not provide a moratorium on payment of principal or interest.

(4) Loans shall be for a period of up to 25 years with an interest rate set annually by the department at 50 percent of the average interest rate paid by the state on general obligation bonds in the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the loan agreement is executed.

(5) No single project may receive more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) from the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1034, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12928.1.

The department shall give priority to projects of agencies located in overdrafted groundwater basins and those projects of critical need, to projects whose feasibility studies show the greatest economic justification and the greatest engineering and hydrogeologic feasibility as determined by the department, and to projects located in areas which have existing water management programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1034, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12928.2.

A contract for a loan pursuant to Section 12928 shall require the prior approval of the California Water Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1034, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12928.3.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, criteria and procedures for establishing the eligibility of an agency and a project to qualify for loans, and any terms and conditions necessary to protect the investment of the state and to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1034, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12928.4.

As a part of the contract for a loan, the agency shall agree to indemnify and hold and save the state, the department, and its employees free from any and all liability for damages that may arise out of the work performed on projects financed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1034, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12928.6.

Groundwater recharge projects developed pursuant to this chapter shall be eligible for funding pursuant to any bond law previously or subsequently approved by the voters if the projects are otherwise eligible for funding under the bond law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1034, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7.7. Environmental Water Act of 1989 [12929. - 12929.46.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12929. - 12929.2.]

12929.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Environmental Water Act of 1989.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to prescribe the purposes of the Environmental Water Fund, and to create, and prescribe the purposes of, the Environmental Water Program and the Water Quality Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.2.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(b) “Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(c) “Mono Lake Basin” means Mono Lake and its watershed.

(d) “Environmental Water Program” means the Environmental Water Program created pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 12929.20).

(e) “Mono Lake Committee” means the California nonprofit citizens organization formed to save Mono Lake.

(f) “Water Quality Program” means the Water Quality program created pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 12929.30).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Environmental Water Fund [12929.10. - 12929.15.]

12929.10.

The Environmental Water Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. There shall be deposited in the fund all moneys transferred or appropriated to the fund and all income derived from investment of moneys that are in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 716, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.11.

The department shall expend the money appropriated to it from the Environmental Water Fund for projects or programs concerning the water resources of the state that will contribute significant environmental benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.12.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that sixty-five million dollars ($65,000,000) of the funds that may be transferred, pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 12937, to the California Water Fund from the California Water Resources Development Bond Fund, shall be appropriated to the Environmental Water Fund. It is the intent of the Legislature, subject to subdivision (b), to appropriate to the Environmental Water Fund one million dollars ($1,000,000) in the 1990–91 fiscal year and eight million dollars ($8,000,000) per year in fiscal years 1991–92 to 1998–99, inclusive. However, the director, in consultation with the Department of Finance, may accelerate payments to the California Water Fund for appropriation to the Environmental Water Fund if the director deems it appropriate to do so.

(b) It is the further intent of the Legislature that if the director determines that all or any portion of the amount that would otherwise be appropriated in any fiscal year to the Environmental Water Fund in accordance with subdivision (a), or to the Delta Flood Protection Fund pursuant to Section 12303, is required for continued construction of the State Water Resources Development System pursuant to Section 12938, the entire amount that would otherwise be appropriated to the Environmental Fund for that fiscal year shall be reduced to zero before any reduction is made in the amount to be appropriated to the Delta Flood Protection Fund. It is also the intent of the Legislature that any reduction in funds appropriated to the Environmental Water Fund and the Delta Flood Protection Fund pursuant to this subdivision be made up from funds transferred to the California Water Fund pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 12937 in subsequent fiscal years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 676.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.13.

It is further the intent of the Legislature that the reductions and transfers described in Sections 11913, 12303, and 12929.12 shall continue until the obligation of the State Water Resources Development System to reimburse the California Water Fund pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 12937 is satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 716, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.14.

It is the intent of the Legislature that nine million dollars ($9,000,000) per year be appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the 1994–95 to 1997–98 fiscal years, inclusive, to pay for programs and projects included in the environmental water program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 626, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.15.

From the funds appropriated to the department from the Environmental Water Fund, it is the intent of the Legislature that the department allocate at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) per year, in the 1995–96 to 1997–98 fiscal years, inclusive, to programs and projects included in the Water Quality Program. However, not more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) of the funds appropriated to the Environmental Water Fund pursuant to Section 12929.12 shall be appropriated for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 626, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Environmental Water Program [12929.20. - 12929.27.]

12929.20.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that diversions of water out of the Mono Lake Basin by the City of Los Angeles have lowered the water level of Mono Lake and that future water diversions need to be managed to protect Mono Lake and the Mono Lake Basin. The department, upon acceptance of an application or applications pursuant to Section 12929.21, shall expend money available from the Environmental Water Fund to preserve the wildlife and environment of the Mono Lake Basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.21.

The City of Los Angeles, jointly with the Mono Lake Committee, may submit one or more grant applications to the department to protect and preserve the Mono Lake Basin. The grant applications shall benefit and enhance the lake’s ecosystem and contribute to permanent protection of the Mono Lake Basin environment, including, but not limited to, nesting and migratory bird populations, air quality, fish, and other wildlife, as well as provide replacement water and power to the city. Any project funded by a grant shall not unreasonably affect fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.22.

Funds expended for purposes of Section 12929.20 shall be expended only for an eligible project which is consistent with a grant application pursuant to Section 12929.21. The City of Los Angeles shall be the sole grantee for any funds expended for an eligible project.

For purposes of this section, “eligible project” means a water or power conservation project, a waste water reclamation project, a conjunctive use program, a groundwater recharge project, the enlargement of existing water or power facilities owned by the City of Los Angeles, electric power production facilities, or a water marketing program. Priority shall be given to projects or programs that conserve water or power that has been previously developed.

It is the intent of the Legislature that eligible projects are intended to find replacement water and power for the City of Los Angeles and to limit any impact of reduced diversions from the Mono Lake Basin on statewide water and power supplies, except for any reduced diversions ordered as specified in Section 12929.24. No money made available pursuant to this chapter shall be spent by the city to buy water from the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.23.

Until June 30, 1994, 60 percent of the funds that have been appropriated to the Environmental Water Program shall be reserved exclusively for the funding of applications pursuant to Section 12929.21. Applicants may also apply for funds that may be appropriated in the future to the Environmental Water Program. After July 1, 1994, all funds reserved by this section and all other funds that may be appropriated to the Environmental Water Program may be used either to protect and preserve the Mono Lake Basin or for programs and projects listed in Section 12929.26.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.24.

The state shall not accept any application for funds pursuant to Section 12929.21 that would expend any state money to replace water or power supplies lost by the City of Los Angeles because of a final court judgment or final board order regarding the Mono Lake Basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.25.

This chapter does not affect the rights or obligations of any party involved in litigation regarding the Mono Lake Basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12929.26.
